Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-3,208
Snowmobiles; registration required.

Except as otherwise provided in sections 60-3,207 to 60-3,219, no person shall operate any snowmobile within the State of Nebraska unless such snowmobile has been registered in accordance with sections 60-3,209 to 60-3,213.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 208.